Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.413.070

General paraeducator certificate.

(1)(a) School districts must implement this section only in school years for which state funding is appropriated specifically for the purposes of this section and only for the number of days that are funded by the appropriation.

(b) School districts are encouraged to provide at least one day of the ten days of general courses, as defined by the board, on the state paraeducator standards of practice as a professional learning day, where paraeducators collaborate with certified staff and other classified staff on applicable courses.

(2)(a) Paraeducators may become eligible for a general paraeducator certificate by completing the four-day fundamental course of study, as required under RCW 28A.413.060, and an additional ten days of general courses, as defined by the board, on the state paraeducator standards of practice, described in RCW 28A.413.050.

(b) Paraeducators are not required to meet the general paraeducator certificate requirements under this subsection (2) unless the courses necessary to meet the requirements are funded by the state in accordance with subsection (1) of this section and RCW 28A.413.060(1).

(3) Beginning September 1, 2019, school districts must:

(a) Provide paraeducators with general courses on the state paraeducator standards of practice; and

(b) Ensure all paraeducators employed by the district meet the general certification requirements of this section within three years of completing the four-day fundamental course of study.

(4) The general paraeducator certificate does not expire.

[ 2019 c 268 s 4; 2018 c 153 s 4; 2017 c 237 s 8.]